Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3506
County level data on juveniles.

County level data on juveniles shall be maintained and compiled by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice on arrest rates; petition rates; detention rates and utilization; offender profile data, such as offense, race, age, and sex; and admissions to staff secure and temporary holdover facilities.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 6.